Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.900

References to the secretary or department of social and health services—1989 1st ex.s. c 9.

All references to the secretary or department of social and health services in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the secretary or department of health when referring to the functions transferred in RCW 43.70.080, 18.104.005, 70.08.005, 70.24.005, 70.40.005, 70.41.005, and 70.54.005.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 24; 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 31; 2007 c 52 s 2; 1990 c 33 s 580; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 801.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Statutory references—Severability—1990 c 33: See RCW 28A.900.100 through 28A.900.102.